West Virginia, session 2026, SB746.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-43. Class WV resident and Class WVV nonresident wildlife viewing stamp. A Class WV stamp is a resident wildlife viewing stamp. A Class WVV stamp is a nonresident wildlife viewing stamp. These stamps entitle a Class Q hunting permit holder to view wildlife in all counties of the state, except as prohibited by rules of the director, on state-owned property and roads, including fire roads, select access roads, and roads that normally are gated, in a regularly licensed vehicle, and excluding all utility-terrain vehicles (UTVs) and all-terrain vehicles (ATVs), regardless of registration status as a street legal special purpose vehicle. The fee for Class WV and Class WVV stamps shall be proposed by the director for legislative approval pursuant to the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. The revenue derived from the sale of these stamps shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Division of Natural Resources and shall be used and paid out, upon order of the director, for wildlife resource program expenses. These stamps, issued in a form prescribed by the director, shall be in addition to a hunting or fishing license or Class Q permit. These stamps require that the licensee purchase an appropriate base hunting or fishing license, as determined by the director, before participating in the activities specified in this section. This section may not apply to Coopers Rock State Forest or Kanawha State Forest.